Maryland, session 2026, SB0406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
5–602.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person may not possess
cannabis in sufficient quantity reasonably to indicate under all circumstances an intent to
distribute or dispense cannabis.
5–603.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0406*

SENATE BILL 406
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person may not cultivate or grow
cannabis or manufacture a cannabis product, or manufacture, distribute, or possess a
machine, equipment, an instrument, an implement, a device, or a combination of them that
is adapted to produce cannabis or a cannabis product under circumstances that reasonably
indicate an intent to use it to produce, sell, or dispense cannabis or a cannabis product in
violation of this title.
5–621.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Drug trafficking crime” means:
(I) a felony or a conspiracy to commit a felony involving the
possession, distribution, manufacture, or importation of a controlled dangerous substance
under §§ 5–602 through 5–609 and 5–614 of this subtitle; OR
(II) A MISDEMEANOR OR A CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT A
MISDEMEANOR IN VIOLATION OF § 5–602(B)(1) OR § 5–603(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) During and in relation to a drug trafficking crime, a person may not:
(1) possess a firearm under sufficient circumstances to constitute a nexus
to the drug trafficking crime; or
(2) use, wear, carry, or transport a firearm.
(c) (1) In addition to the sentence provided for the drug trafficking crime, a
person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a felony and on conviction is
subject to:
(i) for a first violation, imprisonment for not less than 5 years and
not exceeding 20 years; or
(ii) for each subsequent violation, imprisonment for not less than 10
years and not exceeding 20 years.
(2) (i) The court shall impose a minimum sentence of 5 years under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection.
(ii) The court shall impose a minimum sentence of 10 years under
paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) (i) A court may not suspend any part of a mandatory minimum
sentence.

SENATE BILL 406 3
(ii) Except as provided in § 4–305 of the Correctional Services
Article, a person sentenced under this subsection is not eligible for parole.
(iii) A sentence imposed under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection
shall be consecutive to and not concurrent with any other sentence imposed by virtue of the
commission of the drug trafficking crime.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.